Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1350
Definitions.

In the Uniform Registration of Canadian Money Judgments Act:

(1) Canada means the sovereign nation of Canada and its provinces and territories. Canadian has a corresponding meaning.

(2) Canadian judgment means a judgment of a court of Canada, other than a judgment that recognizes the judgment of another foreign country.

Laws 2021, LB501, § 14.